Washington statutes.
RCW 39.58.140

Liability of treasurers and state treasurer.

When deposits are made in accordance with this chapter, a treasurer and the state treasurer shall not be liable for any loss thereof resulting from the failure or default of any public depositary without fault or neglect on his or her part or on the part of his or her assistants or clerks.

[ 2009 c 9 s 13; 1996 c 256 s 16; 1969 ex.s. c 193 s 29.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 9: See note following RCW 39.58.010.

Liability of state treasurer: RCW 43.85.070.